Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.100

Licensure or certification without examination—Requirements.

The director may, upon application and payment of a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086, issue a license and certificate without further examination as a geologist or specialty geologist to any person who holds a license or certificate of qualification issued by proper authority of any state, territory, or possession of the United States, District of Columbia, or any foreign country, if the applicant's qualifications, as evaluated by the board, meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by the director.

[ 2000 c 253 s 11.]